Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Medical Assistance Act
71-5-106. Determination of eligibility for medical assistance.

The departments of health and human services, as may be designated by the governor, shall make the determination of eligibility under this part, subject to approval of the finance, ways and means, and the health and welfare committees of the senate, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare. Such determination of eligibility may be accomplished through contractual agreement with agencies of the federal government. Eligibility for assistance shall be determined in a manner that will ensure that medical assistance is provided, within the limits of available resources subject to federal financial participation, to all persons who, although ineligible for supplementary security income (SSI), complied under Title XVI of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.), or are medically needy.

A notice that awards medicaid benefits shall include the following statement:

“A person with both medicare and medicaid does not usually need other health insurance. Did you buy a medicare supplement policy after November 4, 1991? If so, you can have the insurance company put your policy and your payments on hold. The insurance company can do this for up to twenty-four (24) months while you are on medicaid. If you lose medicaid during the twenty-four-month period, you can get your policy back.

“To put your policy on hold, contact your insurance company within ninety (90) days of when you get medicaid. To get your policy back, you must tell your insurance company within ninety (90) days after you lose medicaid.”

A notice that terminates medicaid benefits shall include the following statement:

“Did you have medicare supplement insurance that you put on hold while you had medicaid? You may be able to get your policy back if you have put it on hold less than two (2) years ago. Contact your insurance company within ninety (90) days after you lose medicaid. Tell the insurance company that you want your policy reinstated.”

In determining the eligibility of an individual for benefits under this chapter, resources that have been previously owned and transferred by the individual, or such individual's spouse, shall be treated in a manner consistent with Title XIX of the Social Security Act.

Any transaction described in subsection (b) shall be presumed to have been for the purpose of establishing eligibility for benefits or assistance under this part, unless such individual or eligible spouse furnishes convincing evidence to establish that the transaction was exclusively for some other purpose.

For purposes of subsection (b), the value of such a resource or interest shall be the fair market value of such resource or interest at the time it was sold or given away, less the amount of compensation received for such resource or interest, if any.

In the event that any resource, or interest in any resource, is given away or sold for less than fair market value by a person holding a power of attorney by the owner of the resource or interest, such resource or interest shall not be counted as a resource to the owner of the property pursuant to subsections (b)-(d) under the following circumstances:

The power of attorney was not executed for the purpose of establishing or continuing medicaid eligibility;

The owner of the property has, at the time of the transfer, neither actual nor constructive knowledge of the transfer or is unable because of mental or physical incapacity to take reasonable and necessary steps to prevent such sale or transfer.

If any resource or interest in any resource is given away or sold for less than fair market value by a person holding a power of attorney by the owner of such resource, the sale or gift shall be set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction as being in defraud of the state upon motion of the state of Tennessee or of any party representing the owner of the resource, unless the person holding the power of attorney proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the sale or gift was exclusively for some other purpose than the establishment or continuance of medicaid eligibility.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (f), the person exercising the power of attorney and the person to whom the resource is given or sold for less than fair market value shall be jointly and severally liable to the state of Tennessee for any costs incurred by it in providing medicaid benefits to the owner of the resource, until such time as the conveyance is set aside, for any costs, including attorney fees, court costs, and any other related expenses, incurred by it in having the conveyance set aside, and for any losses incurred as a result of any damage, destruction, expenditure, waste, transfer of the resources or other act of the persons involved that diminishes the value of the resource. Such liability shall be limited to the actual value of the resource.

In the event that a person otherwise eligible for medicaid has filed an action in court to set aside a transfer for less than value because of fraud, duress, trick or otherwise, such person shall be or shall remain eligible, or both, and the state of Tennessee shall have recourse under subsections (f) and (g) to set aside the transfer and recover.

In addition to the other categories of eligibility under this section, there shall be a category of medical assistance eligibility for those children who:

Were born after September 30, 1967;

Are eighteen (18) years of age or younger; and

Are in intact families that meet the TANF income and resource requirements; or

As provided in Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.), have been determined to be a child with special needs, for whom there is in effect an adoption assistance agreement between the department of children's services and an adoptive parent or parents, and who the department of children's services has determined cannot be placed with an adoptive parent or parents without medical assistance because such child has special needs for medical, mental health, or rehabilitative care.

Subsections (b)-(j) shall not limit the ability of the state to extend medical assistance to persons who are medically needy pursuant to any federal waiver received by the state that waives any or all of the provisions of Title XIX or pursuant to any other federal law as adopted by amendment to the required Title XIX state plan.

Effective January 1, 1998, if the actual enrollment of non-previously enrolled children under eighteen (18) years of age that began on April 1, 1997, has not reached seventy-five percent (75%) of anticipated enrollment level of fifty thousand (50,000) children, the commissioner of health shall offer enrollment in the Title XIX waiver program, TennCare, to children under eighteen (18) years of age whose family income is below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level schedule in effect for calculation of TennCare premiums. Such offer of enrollment in the TennCare program shall be made in accordance with TennCare promulgated rules and regulations. It is the legislative intent that this section be implemented only to the extent that it is determined to be consistent with the terms, conditions and eligibility criteria of the TennCare waiver as approved by the United States department of health and human services and that state and federal funding is available for such purpose.

Beginning January 1, 2003, the bureau of TennCare or its designee shall determine eligibility for TennCare on an annual basis as follows:

All non-medicaid eligible TennCare enrollees will have the responsibility to complete an eligibility process each year; in the absence of reapplication and completion of the process, coverage will expire;

Upon notification by the bureau of TennCare, the enrollee must submit application for continuation of eligibility within ninety (90) days; once an application has been timely submitted, the enrollee must provide all required documentation to verify continued eligibility in accordance with TennCare rules and regulations;

Notification to the enrollee is presumed when a notice is mailed to the last known address;

Lack of receipt of the notification does not excuse the responsibility of the enrollee to submit an application and provide documentation for continuation of eligibility as required by TennCare rules and regulations if the enrollee has changed addresses and failed to notify the bureau of TennCare or its designee; and

Failure of the enrollee to contact the bureau of TennCare or its designee concerning a change in address relieves the bureau of responsibility for contacting the enrollee.

To the extent permitted by federal law, the state may impose a reasonable fee for costs of eligibility determinations for applicants applying for medical assistance as part of the medically eligible expansion population under the TennCare waiver.

In the TennCare waiver expansion population, except for persons medically eligible as uninsurable persons, enrollment shall not be permitted for individuals from households with incomes of greater than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of federal poverty levels.

Except as may be required by federal law or the TennCare waiver, no person shall be eligible to receive TennCare benefits, except employee health insurance subsidy payments, as part of the TennCare waiver expansion population if such person is enrolled in a health insurance plan as such coverage is defined in TennCare rules and regulations, or if such person is eligible for participation in medicare or group health insurance offered through an employer or family member's employer, or COBRA coverage.

All determinations of eligibility for persons medically eligible as uninsurable in the TennCare waiver's expansion population shall be made on the basis of health conditions that prevent the person from obtaining health insurance. Such a determination will be based upon a review of medical records and information in accordance with TennCare rules and regulations.

To the extent permitted by the terms of relevant court orders and decrees, any applicable federal waiver under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act or any other federal law, the bureau of TennCare may not remove persons from eligibility for or participation in medical assistance provided pursuant to this chapter for reasons relating to restricting eligibility or enrollment for fiscal or other reasons that are not required by federal law until the bureau has complied with both of the following:

The bureau has verified at the time of application the validity of the social security number of every person enrolled in the medical assistance program provided pursuant to this chapter with appropriate federal databases in order to determine whether persons who are not lawful residents of the United States are present in the program, or are otherwise fraudulent applicants; and

Removed from the program all such ineligible persons who are current recipients in the program but are not lawful residents of the United States, or are otherwise fraudulent applicants.

An individual who is an inmate of a public institution shall have eligibility for medical assistance suspended but not terminated during periods of actual incarceration.

An individual who is an inmate of a public institution shall be eligible for temporary reinstatement of medical assistance for care received outside of a jail or correctional facility in a hospital or other health care facility for more than twenty-four (24) hours.

A public institution may make efforts to establish eligibility for or renew assistance for such individuals prior to their release from the public institution.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 6; 1973, ch. 276, § 4; 1974, ch. 440, § 1; T.C.A., § 14-1906; Acts 1981, ch. 315, §§ 1-3; 1981, ch. 476, § 1; 1982, ch. 714, § 1; 1985, ch. 430, § 2; 1986, ch. 845, § 1; T.C.A., §14-23-106; Acts 1987, ch. 332, § 1; 1989, ch. 143, § 1; 1991, ch. 406, § 1; 1992, ch. 799, § 1; 1993, ch. 358, §§ 5, 6; 1997, ch. 495, § 1; 1998, ch. 1097, § 29; 2002, ch. 880, § 2; 2004, ch. 673, §§ 4-8; 2009, ch. 429, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 86; 2014, ch. 926, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 134.

Code Commission Notes.

Former references to “aid to families with dependent children (AFDC)” were deleted as obsolete by the code commission and were changed to “temporary assistance for needy families (TANF).”The provisions of this section may be affected by the agreement between the federal and state governments that created the TennCare program.

Compiler's Notes. Section 2 of Acts 1982, ch. 714 provides “that nothing contained in this Act shall be construed to invalidate any eligibility determination made on or after July 1, 1981, in accordance with Public Chapter 315 of the Public Acts of 1981 and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.”

This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

The Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985 (COBRA), P.L. 99-272, § 9401, referred to in this section, is codified in 42 U.S.C. §§ 1396a and 1396b.

For the transfer of TennCare from the department of finance and administration to the department of health, See Executive Orders Nos. 1 (January 26, 1995) and 11 (January 7, 1997).

For transfer of the TennCare program and its related functions and administrative support from the department of health to the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 23 (October 19, 1999).

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 1 provided that the act is, and may be cited as, “The TennCare Reform Act of 2002”.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 5 provided that any costs associated with the implementation of that act, except as to the costs of the medicaid fraud control unit of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, shall be paid from existing funds appropriated to the TennCare program.

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 8 provided that:

“(a) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall study the feasibility of outsourcing eligibility determinations and re-verifications for the TennCare expansion population, including requesting information from potential contractors. It is the legislative intent that information from interested potential contractors be received by October 15, 2002.

“(b) The fiscal review committee, in consultation with the bureau of TennCare and the select oversight committee on TennCare (repealed), shall evaluate the responses from potential contractors and shall, no later than January 1, 2003, report its findings to the general assembly, the commissioner of finance and administration, the comptroller of the treasury and the governor, relative to whether eligibility and re-verification services should be contracted and procured through competitive proposals.”

Acts 2002, ch. 880, § 20 provided: that the provisions of that act shall only apply so long as the state operates the TennCare program as a statewide waiver with an expansion population of uninsureds and uninsurables under Section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1315]. If at any time the state ceases to operate under such a waiver, then the provisions of the act shall not be applied and enforcement of such provisions shall be terminated.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the finance, ways and means, and the health and welfare committees of the senate, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare” for “the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate and the health committee of the house of representatives” in the first sentence of (a)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Licensing of nurses, title 63, ch. 7.

Rules and regulations, funding medical assistance, §71-5-134.

Tennessee Medicaid False Claims Act, §§71-5-181 —71-5-185.

“Title XIX” defined, §71-5-103.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Issues Raised by States' Exclusion of Fertility Drugs from Medicaid Coverage in Light of Mandated Coverage of Viagra, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 359 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. Medical expenses of inmates, OAG 97-010, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 22 (2/4/97).

71-5-107. Kinds of medical services.

Medical assistance, including demonstration projects and programs designed to enhance the efficient and economic operation of the medicaid program, shall be provided to those classes of individuals determined to be eligible under § 71-5-106. This medical assistance, in the amount, scope, and duration determined by the commissioner of health and to the extent permitted by federal law, may include:

Inpatient hospital services, other than services in an institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases;

Outpatient hospital services;

Other laboratory and X-ray services;

Skilled nursing home services, other than services in an institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases;

Physicians' services, whether furnished in the office, the patient's home, a hospital, a skilled nursing home, or elsewhere;

Drugs;

Inpatient hospital services for individuals sixty-five (65) years of age or over in an institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases, and inpatient hospital services for individuals under twenty-one (21) years of age in institutions for mental diseases, or in case of an individual who was receiving such inpatient services for mental disease in the period immediately preceding the date on which such individual becomes twenty-one (21) years of age:

The date on which such individual no longer requires the services; or

If earlier, the date such individual becomes twenty-two (22) years of age;

Nonmedical nursing care shall be rendered in accordance with the tenets and practice of a recognized church or religious denomination to any indigent person otherwise qualified for assistance under this part who depends upon healing by prayer or spiritual means alone in accordance with the tenets and practice of such church or religious denomination;

Skilled nursing home services for individuals sixty-five (65) years of age or over in institutions for tuberculosis or mental diseases;

Medical screening, diagnostic and treatment services for eligible categorically connected individuals under twenty-one (21) years of age;

Psychiatric clinic services in approved facilities;

Home health care services provided in the recipient's home. The services may follow the recipient into the community subject to subdivision (a)(12)(B);

Home health nurses or aides may accompany a recipient outside the home during the course of delivery of prior approved home health nurse or home health aide services if all of the following criteria are met:

The home health nurse or home health aide shall not transport the recipient;

The home health agency shall have discretion as to whether or not to accompany a recipient outside the home. The circumstance under which a home health agency may exercise such discretion shall include, without limitation, when the home health agency has concern regarding any of the following:

The scheduling or safety of the transportation;

The health or safety of their employee or the recipient;

The ability to safely and effectively deliver services in the alternative setting; and

The additional expense that would be required to accompany a patient outside the home;

Additional visits or hours of care will not be approved for coverage for the purpose of accompanying a recipient outside the home. Services will be limited to services to which the recipient would be entitled if the services were provided exclusively at the recipient's place of residence; and

No additional reimbursement shall be paid to the home health agency in association with the decision of a home health agency to accompany a patient outside the home;

Nothing in this subdivision (a)(12) is intended to create an entitlement to services outside the home;

A home health agency shall not be subject to any claims or cause of action as result of exercising its discretion under this subdivision (a)(12);

Transportation for approved emergency medical examination or treatment, or both;

Intellectual disability and rehabilitation services;

Intermediate care facilities services;

Medical services rendered by community or neighborhood health organizations or clinics, including organizations or clinics where some or all of the medical services are provided by medical students presently enrolled in a medical school accredited by the Association of American Medical Colleges or licensed registered nurses, or both, and where such students or licensed registered nurses are under the direction of a licensed physician or physicians;

Family planning services and supplies;

Basic dental care services;

Medical and surgical services rendered by ambulatory surgical treatment centers;

Services rendered by rural health clinics;

Medical assistance and home- and community-based services to those eligible being served through a health care financing administration (HCFA) approved waiver designed to provide more efficient and economical alternatives to institutional care;

Services by nurse anesthetists who are registered by the Tennessee board of nursing, who have completed an advance course in anesthesia, and who hold a current certification from the American Association of Nurse Anesthetists as a nurse anesthetist;

Nurse midwife services performed by a person who is licensed by the Tennessee board of nursing as a registered nurse under the authority of the Nursing Practice Act, compiled in title 63, chapter 7, and certified by the American College of Nurse Midwives as a certified nurse midwife;

Services provided by certified pediatric nurse practitioners and certified family nurse practitioners as required by federal law;

Sickle cell disease management services and public education campaign activities specifically related to sickle cell disease, as authorized by 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(a)(27) and (x), with reimbursement in accordance with any applicable state plan amendment;

Any contract between a managed care organization (MCO) and the bureau of TennCare to provide medical assistance pursuant to this part shall be appropriately revised or amended in order to comply with the implementation of subdivision (a)(25)(A); and

Language interpreter services, which may include:

Sign language interpreter services when such services are necessary to help recipients who are deaf or hard of hearing obtain covered services; and

Spoken language interpreter services to all recipients with limited English proficiency.

With respect to recipients determined to be “medically needy,” all or a part of the medical services outlined in subsection (a) may be provided, and may, within applicable federal legislation and regulations, be of lesser amounts, duration and scope than medical services provided other medicaid recipients in order to ensure that an expenditure of state funds shall not exceed the amount provided for the operation of the medicaid program.

When the amount, duration, and scope of medical services is lessened so as to no longer include intermediate care facility services, the commissioner of health, with approval of the commissioner of human services, may continue to provide intermediate care facility services to those recipients who have been determined to be medically indigent and placed in a medicaid certified intermediate care facility bed at the time such change in the amount, duration, and scope of medical services is made.

The department shall assist in the development of a demonstration project, which would provide cost effective alternatives to long-term care under the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981, to the extent permissible under the federal law, for institutional and residential homes that provide domiciliary care for the aged and mentally disabled, which project would include the Foster-Group Care Home Association. The development of such demonstration project shall begin on July 1, 1982.

The bureau of TennCare shall have the authority to implement a comprehensive disease management program for certain enrollees of the TennCare program to the extent permitted under federal law and the TennCare waiver. The bureau, through its authority to promulgate rules and regulations, may identify enrollees eligible to participate and the disease categories to be included in the comprehensive disease management program. The bureau, also through its authority to promulgate rules and regulations, may put in place requirements regarding the continued participation of enrollees in the program.

Subject to the availability of funding earmarked for such programs in the general appropriations act and to the extent permitted under federal law and the TennCare waiver, the bureau of TennCare shall have the authority to create in whole or in part and administer a program to be named “The TennCare safety net” which will provide two different components to assist eligible TennCare enrollees:

Certain medical providers in Tennessee shall provide non-emergency health care services without co-payment requirements to certain specified TennCare enrollees. Such services are intended to include only services that are both medically necessary and within the scope of TennCare benefits for the particular enrollee but for which the enrollee cannot meet the co-payment requirements. Through its authority to promulgate rules and regulations, the bureau of TennCare will identify the parameters of this component of the TennCare safety net program, including which enrollees are eligible to participate in this program, allowable benefits under the program, designation of both urban and rural providers who participate in this program, and a funding methodology pursuant to which such providers shall be compensated;

A TennCare foundation will be established that will accept and review applications for medical assistance submitted on behalf of certain specified TennCare enrollees. The members of the foundation shall be appointed by the governor, who shall determine the size and composition of the foundation's membership. The governor should strive to ensure that the membership is representative of the state's geographic and demographic composition with appropriate attention to the representation of women and minorities. Terms for the members will be staggered and the length of terms will be detailed by the governor in making initial or subsequent appointments. The governor shall appoint the chair and vice-chair. For the purposes of administration and availability of records, the TennCare foundation shall be located within the bureau of TennCare; staff assistance shall be provided by the bureau of TennCare or by another entity, should the governor so determine. At the discretion of the governor, the foundation may be placed within another appropriate agency, may create or be reconstituted as a nonprofit entity, or may be terminated at any time; and

Applications for medical assistance from the foundation are not intended, and should not be used, as a means to circumvent or avoid the benefit limits established by the bureau of TennCare. It is expected that these applications will be submitted to address special, unforeseen, or exceptional circumstances. Such applications must be submitted by a licensed medical provider who is treating the enrollee and shall request the provision of medically necessary health care services recommended or prescribed by the enrollee's treating provider that are beyond the scope of benefits provided through the TennCare program benefit package for which the enrollee is eligible. For the purposes of this subsection (f), “beyond the scope of benefits” means a benefit that is covered within limits by TennCare but for which the enrollee has exceeded the covered limits of that benefit. It does not include benefits that are not covered to any extent under TennCare for the applicant. The foundation will not consider matters of eligibility for the TennCare program. Through its authority to promulgate rules and regulations, the bureau of TennCare will identify the parameters of this component of the TennCare safety net program, including the process for making application to this foundation, which enrollees are eligible to apply, and a mechanism for determining which applications will be reviewed by the foundation. The foundation will not have rule-making authority;

Notwithstanding the availability of assistance from the foundation, no enrollee has an expectation of or an entitlement to assistance from the foundation;

There exists no right of appeal regarding an application for assistance; and

Because the level of funding provided to the foundation is limited, the foundation may not be able to fully or partially fund all applications. The decisions of which applications to fund will be solely within the discretion of the foundation;

Nothing in this subsection (f) shall be construed to require a contested case hearing as set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, nor shall any determinations made by the foundation be considered final orders from which appeals can be taken. The consideration of applications provided for by this subdivision (f)(2)(D) shall not constitute hearings as set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act;

The foundation shall consider applications and determine in its sole discretion and without requirement for written findings whether the application should be granted in whole or in part. The foundation's determination on an enrollee's application shall have no binding precedential effect on the consideration of any other enrollees' applications;

In the event that a matter being considered by the foundation presents a real or apparent conflict of interest for any staff or member, such staff or member shall disclose the conflict to the chair and be recused from any official action taken on the matter;

Notwithstanding the open meetings law, compiled in title 8, chapter 44 or any other law to the contrary, any and all meetings of the TennCare foundation are to be considered confidential and closed to the public. Members and staff shall maintain strict standards of confidentiality in the handling of all matters before the foundation. In addition, all relevant federal and state laws regarding patient privacy and confidentiality will be adhered to. All material and information, regardless of form, medium, or method of communication, provided to or acquired by a foundation member or staff in the course of the foundation's work, shall be regarded as confidential information, shall not be disclosed, and are not public records. In addition, all material and information, regardless of form, medium, or method of communication, made or generated by a member or foundation staff in the course of the foundation's work, shall be regarded as confidential information and shall not be disclosed and are deemed not to be a public record. All necessary steps shall be taken by members and staff to safeguard the confidentiality of such material or information in conformance with federal and state law;

Every October 1, the foundation shall report in writing to the governor, the health and welfare committee and commerce and labor committee of the senate, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare regarding how funds allocated to the foundation were spent during the previous fiscal year. Such report shall contain the following information:

How many applications were received;

How many applications the foundation granted;

The type of services and items that were funded; and

Statistical information, by gender, race, and division of the state, on who applied for and who received the funds;

Whether members shall receive reasonable compensation for their service on the TennCare foundation will be determined at the discretion of the governor; members may be reimbursed for those expenses allowed by the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter;

If any federal or state court or other tribunal with jurisdiction:

Determines that any aspect of subdivision (f)(2)(A), (f)(2)(B), (f)(2)(C), (f)(2)(D), (f)(2)(E), or (f)(2)(G) violates federal law, state law, or any existing court order or consent decree, and

Makes effective an order enjoining compliance with any aspect of these provisions or requiring non-trivial changes in the terms or applications of these provisions,the challenged provisions may not be severed from the remainder of this subdivision (f)(2). In this event, all provisions of this subdivision (f)(2) will terminate and have no further effect. Such termination shall occur no later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the order unless such order is stayed by the issuing court or the reviewing court pending disposition of an appeal of the order. The decision whether or not to appeal any such order will be at the sole discretion of the bureau of TennCare. This nonseverability provision shall be self-executing. If this subdivision (f)(2) is terminated while appropriated funds remain, the unused funds shall revert back to the general fund. Any payments for services or items which have been approved but not yet disbursed as of the date of termination shall be paid, but no further applications for payments shall be considered or granted after the date of termination. In the event of termination under this subsection (f), the foundation may be reinstated only by new legislative action and a new appropriation by the general assembly.

The bureau of TennCare shall have the authority, in collaboration with one or more medical schools located in Tennessee, to establish an evidence-based medicine initiative for the purpose of developing medical protocols and integrating standards of best practices within the delivery of TennCare services. To the extent that evidence-based medical protocols are authorized by the bureau of TennCare, such protocols shall satisfy the standard of medical necessity as set forth in § 71-5-144. The bureau of TennCare, through its authority to promulgate rules and regulations, shall establish the parameters for the initiative, including who can participate and how the initiative is to be implemented.

Acts 1968, ch. 551, § 7; 1969, ch. 326, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 596, § 1; 1973, ch. 73, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1973, ch. 262, § 1; 1973, ch. 276, § 5; 1974, ch. 802, § 2; 1976, ch. 572, § 1; 1978, ch. 875, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 14-1907; Acts 1981, ch. 225, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 476, § 2; 1982, ch. 740, §§ 6-8, 19; T.C.A., §14-23-107; Acts 1987, ch. 310, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 510, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 183, § 1; 1998, ch. 1093, § 2; 2004, ch. 673, § 2; 2009, ch. 471, § 1; 2011, ch. 197, § 2; 2011, ch. 410, § 6(b); 2013, ch. 236, § 77; 2015, ch. 122, § 1; 2017, ch. 243, § 1; 2019, ch. 329, § 6; 2019, ch. 345, § 135.

Compiler's Notes. The Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981, referred to in this section, was passed as P.L. 97-35, P.L. 97-115 and P.L. 97-123 and is codified throughout the United States Code.

Acts 2004, ch. 673, § 29 provided that to effectuate the provisions of the act, the commissioner of finance and administration shall have the authority to promulgate any necessary rules and regulations not otherwise provided for in this act. All rules and regulations provided for in this act are authorized to be promulgated as public necessity rules (now emergency rules) pursuant to §4-5-209 (now §4-5-208). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2011, ch. 197, § 3 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, which amended subdivision (a)(14), a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before May 12, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 197, § 4 provided that nothing in the act, which amended subdivision (a)(14), shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before May 12, 2011.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Acts 2019, ch. 329, § 8 provided that the use of the term “deaf or hard of hearing” in the act, which amended this section, shall not be construed to infringe on any right or protection, or absolve any entity of its obligations under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.), or any other relevant law.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by ch. 329 substituted “recipients who are deaf or hard of hearing” for “hearing impaired recipients” in (a)(26)(A).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 345 substituted “the health and welfare committee and commerce and labor committee of the senate, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare” for “the health and welfare committee and commerce and labor committee of the senate and the health committee and insurance and banking committee of the house of representatives” in the introductory language of (f)(2)(H).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 329, § 9. May 8, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Issues Raised by States' Exclusion of Fertility Drugs from Medicaid Coverage in Light of Mandated Coverage of Viagra, 54 Vand. L. Rev. 359 (2001).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of residence requirement for organ transplant coverage, OAG 98-075, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (4/1/98).

Preemption of requirements for transplant coverage of uninsurable TennCare enrollees, OAG 98-075, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (4/1/98).